Maryland, session 2025, HB1080.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
1–207.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ALL EMPLOYEES OF A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT
OF A COUNTY OR A MUNICIPALITY IN THE STATE.
(B) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (C) THROUGH (E) OF THIS SECTION, EACH
GOVERNMENTAL UNIT MAY PROVIDE DISASTER SERVICE LEAVE WITH PAY TO
EMPLOYEES SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION.
(C) ON REQUEST, AN EMPLOYEE SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY BE
ENTITLED TO DISASTER SERVICE LEAVE WITH PAY IF:
(1) (I) THE EMPLOYEE IS CERTIFIED BY THE AMERICAN RED
CROSS AS A DISASTER SERVICE VOLUNTEER; AND
(II) THE AMERICAN RED CROSS REQUESTS THE SERVICES OF
THE EMPLOYEE DURING A DISASTER THAT IS DESIGNATED AT LEVEL II OR ABOVE
– 1 –

Ch. 274 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
IN THE REGULATIONS AND PROCEDURES OF THE NATIONAL OFFICE OF THE
AMERICAN RED CROSS; OR
(2) THE EMPLOYEE IS A MEMBER OF:
(I) THE CIVIL AIR PATROL;
(II) THE UNITED STATES COAST GUARD AUXILIARY;
(III) MARYLAND VOLUNTARY ORGANIZATIONS ACTIVE IN
DISASTER;
(IV) A VOLUNTEER EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES
DEPARTMENT;
(V) A VOLUNTEER FIRE DEPARTMENT;
(VI) A VOLUNTEER RESCUE COMPANY OR VOLUNTEER RESCUE
SQUAD; OR
(VII) A COMMUNITY EMERGENCY RESPONSE TEAM.
(C) (D) AN EMPLOYEE MAY USE UP TO 15 30 DAYS OF DISASTER SERVICE
LEAVE IN ANY 12–MONTH PERIOD ONLY AFTER OBTAINING APPROVAL FROM THE
EMPLOYEE’S GOVERNMENTAL UNIT.
(D) (E) DURING A PROLONGED OR RECURRENT DISASTER, THE
EMPLOYEE’S GOVERNMENTAL UNIT MAY:
(1) WAIVE THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTIONS (B) (C) AND (C)
(D) OF THIS SECTION THAT AN EMPLOYEE MUST REQUEST AND OBTAIN APPROVAL
BEFORE THE EMPLOYEE MAY USE DISASTER SERVICE LEAVE, IF WAIVING THE
REQUIREMENT WOULD BE IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE CITIZENS OF THE COUNTY
OR MUNICIPALITY; AND
(2) INCREASE THE NUMBER OF DAYS OF DISASTER SERVICE LEAVE
UNDER SUBSECTION (C) (D) OF THIS SECTION THAT AN EMPLOYEE MAY USE, IF AN
INCREASE IN LEAVE WOULD BE IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE CITIZENS OF THE
COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY.
1–208.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN 38 U.S.C. § 4303 AND 20 C.F.R. § 1002.5(O).
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 274
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ALL EMPLOYEES OF A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT
OF A COUNTY OR A MUNICIPALITY IN THE STATE.
(C) EACH GOVERNMENTAL UNIT MAY PROVIDE LEAVE WITH PAY:
(1) FOR JURY SERVICE;
(2) TO ATTEND EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION EVENTS APPROVED FOR
THIS PURPOSE BY THE HEAD OF THE GOVERNMENTAL UNIT;
(3) FOR UP TO 30 DAYS FOR UNIFORMED SERVICES TRAINING OR
ACTIVE UNIFORMED SERVICES DUTY IN A RESERVE UNIT OF THE ARMED FORCES OR
IN THE ORGANIZED MILITIA;
(4) UNLESS THE EMPLOYEE IS A PARTY TO THE ACTION OR A PAID
WITNESS, TO APPEAR IN COMPLIANCE WITH A SUBPOENA:
(I) IN COURT;
(II) BEFORE A GRAND JURY;
(III) BEFORE AN ADMINISTRATIVE UNIT; OR
(IV) FOR A DEPOSITION;
(5) FOR ADMINISTRATIVE LEAVE FOR THE PURPOSE OF
IMMEDIATELY REMOVING AN EMPLOYEE FROM THE WORK SITE, IF THE EMPLOYEE:
(I) POSES A THREAT TO SELF, ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL, OR
COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL PROPERTY; OR
(II) IS INCAPABLE OF PROPERLY PERFORMING THE
EMPLOYEE’S DUTIES BECAUSE OF EXTRAORDINARY CIRCUMSTANCES; AND
(6) FOR ANY OTHER PAID LEAVE THE HEAD OF A GOVERNMENTAL
UNIT CONSIDERS NECESSARY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 3 –